Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.570

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Guidelines—Allocation system.

In consultation with the eligible institutions of higher education, the office shall set guidelines for the program. These guidelines may include an allocation system based on factors which include but are not limited to: The amount of money available in the trust fund; characteristics of the institutions including the size of the faculty and student body; and the number of professorships previously received.

Any allocation system shall be superseded by conditions in any act of the legislature appropriating funds for this program.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 114; 1987 c 8 s 4. Formerly RCW 28B.10.869.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.